Hawaii, session 2026, SB2481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 346-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§346-51  Public assistance and child welfare services administered by department.  (a) The department of human services shall administer public assistance and child welfare services in the several counties except for payments administered under the federal supplemental security income program or its successor agency.  No person shall be denied the right to petition the department for additional assistance as established under section 346-53(f). (b) When administering child welfare services necessary for the protection and care of an abused or neglected child or a child in danger of becoming delinquent, the department shall: (1)  Record any child welfare interview conducted by the department through: (A)  An electronic video recording; (B)  Body camera video; or (C)  Any other reasonable means of recording; (2)  Securely retain and store the recording required pursuant to paragraph (1): (A)  For a minimum of five years; and (B)  In a manner with access controls and role-based permission management; and (3)  Not release the recording required pursuant to paragraph (1) to any third party except: (A)  As necessary to conduct an investigation pursuant to section 587A-11 or for the prosecution of a criminal offense; or (B)  Unless a court orders otherwise, to a caregiver or guardian upon the caregiver's or guardian's request in connection with a judicial proceeding. (c) Any person or employee of the State who violates subsection (b)(3) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________